Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3204
Act; exemptions.

The Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act does not apply to:

(1) A department or division of a person that provides appraisal management services only to itself; or

(2) A person that provides appraisal management services but does not meet the requirement established by subdivision (6)(c) of section 76-3202.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 73;

Laws 2018, LB17, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB77, § 14.